Utah statutes.
31A-23a-205.   Special requirements for bail bond producers and bail bond
enforcement agents.
(1)  As used in this section, "bail bond producer" and "bail enforcement
agent" have the same definitions as in Section 31A-35-102.
(2)  A bail bond producer may not operate in this state without an appointment
from one or more authorized bail bond surety insurers or licensed bail bond
surety companies.
(3)  A bail bond enforcement agent may not operate in this state without an
appointment from one or more licensed bail bond producers.
